apertium-ur-hi.ur.dix
<!-- 
  Generated from:
    http://www.lama.univ-savoie.fr/~humayoun/UrduMorph/

  Licence: GPL only
  -->
<dictionary>
<alphabet>ئعابپتٹثجچحخدڈذرڑزژسشصضطظعغفقکگلمنوہ,ھءیےيں</alphabet>

  <sdefs>     
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>     
	<sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
	<sdef n="ant"     c=""/>
	<sdef n="top"     c=""/>
	<sdef n="subj"    c="subject"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral"/>     
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>    
    <sdef n="pers"     c="Personal"/>    
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="erg"     c="Ergative"/>        
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>        
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>     
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>     
    <sdef n="pos"    c="posposition"/>     
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb"/>     
	<sdef n="frm"	  c="formal"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"   c="Verb 'to be'"/>     
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>     
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>        
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="adverbial conjunction"/>              
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>     
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>     
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>     
    <sdef n="mf"      c=""/>        
    <sdef n="vaux"    c=""/>     
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>     
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="kisi"      c="kisi/koi"/>     
    <sdef n="ekam"      c="karta"/>
    <sdef n="ekam_ne"      c="karta"/>
    <sdef n="dvi"      c="karm"/>
    <sdef n="tri"      c="karan"/>
    <sdef n="shat_ke"      c="sambandha_ke"/>
    <sdef n="shat_ki"      c="sambandha_ki"/>
    <sdef n="shat_ka"      c="sambandha_ka"/>
    <sdef n="sapt_me"      c="adhikaran"/>              
    <sdef n="itg"     c="interrogative"/>     
    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/>     
    <sdef n="obl"     c="Oblique"/>        
    <sdef n="pos"     c=""/> 
    <sdef n="qnt"     c=""/>            
    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>        
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>      
    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>     
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>     
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>      
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>     
    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present tense"/>        
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past tense"/>     
	<sdef n="impf"    c=" Imperfective participle"/>
	<sdef n="perf"     c="Perfective participle"/>     
	<sdef n="tv"     c="transitive"/> 	
	<sdef n="iv"     c="intransitive"/> 	
    <sdef n="prs"    c="Subjunctive"/>     
    <sdef n="fut"    c="Future"/>
	<sdef n="imp"    c="Imperative"/>
	<sdef n="gna"    c="verbal adverb"/>
	<sdef n="agnt"    c="agentive"/>
	<sdef n="pri"    c="present indicative"/>	 	 
	<sdef n="stem"  c="stem"/>
	<sdef n="ord"  c="ordinal"/>

    <sdef n="cm"         c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"       c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"       c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"       c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"      c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"      c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio"       c="Hyphen"/>



  </sdefs>    

  <pardefs>

    <!-- Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[۰ ۱ ۲ ۳ ۴ ۵ ۶ ۷ ۸ ۹]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>    
       <pardef n="sent">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
       </pardef>

    <!-- Adjectives -->
      

    <pardef n="اچھا__adj">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
       </pardef>

    <pardef n="اچھی__adj">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
       </pardef>

    <pardef n="سچ /ا__adj">
      <e>       <p><l>ا</l><r>ا<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r>ا<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r>ا<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r>ا<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r>ا<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r>ا<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r>ا<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r>ا<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="گزشتہ__adj">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="کچھ__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>وں</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>وں</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>وں</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>وں</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- Verbs -->
  

    <e lm="نامی"><i>نامی</i><par n="اچھی__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="جوابی"><i>جوابی</i><par n="اچھی__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="دولتی"><i>دولتی</i><par n="اچھی__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="پچھلا"><i>پچھل</i><par n="سچ /ا__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="بعض"><i>بعض</i><par n="گزشتہ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="سب"><i>سب</i><par n="گزشتہ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="پورا"><i>پور</i><par n="سچ /ا__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="نہ"><i>نہ</i><par n="گزشتہ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="صاف"><i>صاف</i><par n="گزشتہ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="پرائی"><i>پرائی</i><par n="گزشتہ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="زیادہ"><i>زیادہ</i><par n="گزشتہ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="بند"><i>بند</i><par n="گزشتہ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="گزشتہ"><i>گزشتہ</i><par n="گزشتہ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="مزاحیہ"><i>مزاحیہ</i><par n="اچھا__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="بدنصیب"><i>بدنصیب</i><par n="سچ /ا__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="اچھا"><i>اچھا</i><par n="اچھا__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="نرم"><i>نرم</i><par n="گزشتہ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ہی"><i>ہی</i><par n="گزشتہ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="گرم"><i>گرم</i><par n="اچھا__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="بڑے"><i>بڑے</i><par n="اچھا__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="چھوٹا"><i>چھوٹا</i><par n="اچھا__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="والی"><i>والی</i><par n="اچھی__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="سانولے"><i>سانولے</i><par n="اچھی__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="دبلی"><i>دبلی</i><par n="اچھی__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="چھوٹی"><i>چھوٹی</i><par n="اچھی__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="پتلی"><i>پتلی</i><par n="اچھی__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="اچھی"><i>اچھی</i><par n="اچھی__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="تیکھی"><i>تیکھی</i><par n="اچھی__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="موٹی"><i>موٹی</i><par n="اچھی__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="خوش"><i>خوش</i><par n="اچھا__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="پرانے"><i>پرانے</i><par n="اچھا__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="کچھ"><i>کچھ</i><par n="کچھ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="پیچھے"><i>پیچھے</i><par n="اچھا__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ہر"><i>ہر</i><par n="اچھا__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="طرح"><i>طرح</i><par n="گزشتہ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="سا"><i>سا</i><par n="اچھا__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="نزدیک"><i>نزدیک</i><par n="اچھا__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="؟"><i>؟</i><par n="sent"/></e>
    <e lm="."><i>.</i><par n="sent"/></e>
    <e lm="!"><i>!</i><par n="sent"/></e>
    <e lm="،"><i>،</i><par n="sent"/></e>
